Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB861.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "driver's license" in section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Data field." A discrete piece of information that is 12345678910111213141516171819 printed or otherwise appears on a product.* * *"Driver's license." A license or permit, including a physical driver's license or electronic driver's license, issued by the department under this title to drive a motor vehicle [issued under this title].* * *"Electronic driver's license." An electronic representation of a physical driver's license or identification card that is viewable on an electronic product system. An electronic driver's license shall be considered the same as a physical driver's license issued by the department, except as follows:(1) Under section 1511 (relating to carrying and exhibiting driver's license on demand).(2) Under the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code."Electronic identification card." An electronic representation of a physical identification card that is viewable on an electronic product system."Electronic product." An electronic representation of a physical driver's license or identification card that is in compliance with the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard, as published on the effective date of this definition, and any other driver's license implementation standards approved by the department and published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin, and that is viewable on an electronic product system."Electronic product device." A computer, tablet, smart phone or other electronic personal device used by an electronic product holder to access or display an electronic product or electronic proof of financial responsibility.20250SB0861PN0961 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Electronic product system." The processes, equipment, programming and hardware that:(1) is used to issue electronic products and to administer the use of issued electronic products, including verification of the information contained in a product using a verification system and displaying a product holder's profile; and(2) is designed to comply with the most recently applicable standards of the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators and International Organization for Standardization for electronic products and electronic product systems.* * *"Full profile." All the data included on a physical driver's license or identification card regarding the holder of the product.* * *"Identification card." A physical identification card or electronic identification card issued by the department under this title that identifies the individual to whom the card was issued.* * *" ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard." The interface specifications for the implementation of a driving license in association with a mobile device published by the International Organization for Standardization.* * *"Limited profile." An electronic representation created by the department containing less than all of the data fields printed or otherwise displayed on an individual's product.20250SB0861PN0961 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Physical driver's license." A product issued under this title in a physical format, such as paper or plastic, that identifies the individual to whom the card was issued."Physical identification card." A product issued under this title in a physical format, such as paper or plastic, that identifies the individual to whom the card was issued.* * *"Product." A driver's license or an identification card issued under this title."Product holder." An individual to whom a product has been issued.* * *"Third-party electronic product system." An electronic product system that is not maintained by the department or an agent acting on behalf of the department. The term includes, without limitation, an electronic wallet.* * *"Verification process." A method of authenticating an electronic product through the use of secure encrypted communication."Verifier." A person that seeks to confirm information about an electronic product holder via the department's verification process and the electronic product's data fields. The term does not include an employee of a criminal justice agency as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 9102 (relating to definitions) while in the performance of the employee's duties.* * *Section 2. Section 1510 of Title 75 is amended by adding subsections to read:20250SB0861PN0961 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1510. Issuance and content of driver's license.* * *(k) Electronic products.--The department may issue an electronic product to an individual that holds a physical driver's license issued under this title. The department may create an electronic product system that a licensee may access via an electronic device, including, but not limited to, a smart phone or tablet, to display the licensee's electronic driver's license on the device.(l) Electronic identification card.--The department may issue an electronic identification card to an individual that holds a physical identification card issued under this title. The department may create an electronic product system that an identification card holder may access via an electronic device, including, but not limited to, a smart phone or tablet, to display the electronic identification card on the device.(m) Regulations regarding electronic driver's licenses and electronic identification cards.--The department shall promulgate regulations as necessary to issue and verify electronic products issued by the department under this title or by other government entities.(n) Electronic products.--(1) The department may issue only one electronic product to an individual. The data fields in the electronic product shall match the data fields held by the department for the product holder at the time the electronic product is issued.(2) Changes and updates to data fields held by the department shall be reflected in the data fields in the electronic product. The department shall update the data fields of electronic products when the department updates the 20250SB0861PN0961 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 records of holders of electronic products, but not later than 30 days of updating the records. An electronic product device shall permit the update of the data fields of the electronic product with the department periodically to determine the operating system and application compliance and to update the data fields on the electronic product.(3) The department shall include an attribute on a driver's record indicating the presence of a physical, cognitive or communication impairment, if applicable. The department shall establish a procedure by which a driver may request the inclusion of the designation on the driver's official driving record.(o) Third-party electronic product systems.--The department may issue electronic products through an electronic product system owned, operated or controlled by a third party. Prior to issuing electronic products through a third-party electronic product system, the department must enter into an agreement with the third party to protect the confidentiality of the information contained in records held by the department or the data fields of electronic credentials as required by this title.(p) Electronic driver's license and electronic identification card verification process .-- (1) The department shall develop a verification process that operates when the department issues electronic products.(2) An individual who is issued an electronic product may give consent to a verifier to verify information about the product holder via the department's verification process . (3) The product holder shall determine which data fields are available to the verifier via the product holder's electronic product device. The product holder may make either 20250SB0861PN0961 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a full profile, a limited profile or no data fields available to the verifier.(4) If there is a discrepancy between the information on an individual's physical driver's license or physical identification card and the information in a verification from the department via the verification process , the information from the verification process shall be considered the accurate and current information.(5) The department may enter into agreements with other government entities that issue electronic credentials to allow for verification of those credentials through the department's verification process . The department may enter into agreements with other government entities and jurisdictions that operate a similar verification process for the purpose of verifying electronic products issued under this title.(q) Privacy and tracking.--A verifier may only retain electronic product data elements for which the verifier explicitly obtained consent from the electronic product holder. A verifier must inform the electronic product holder of the use and retention period of the electronic data elements.(r) Reports to General Assembly.--Reports to the General Assembly shall be in accordance with the following:(1) Within 120 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall present an initial report to the individuals listed under paragraph (3) providing details on estimated costs associated with the implementation and maintenance of electronic driver's licenses and electronic identification cards. The report shall also include all estimated initial and recurring costs to establish and 20250SB0861PN0961 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintain a process that allows individuals to apply for an electronic driver's license or electronic identification card.(2) Except for the year the initial report is presented, the department shall submit an annual report to the individuals listed under paragraph (3) no later than July 1 of each year, providing details on costs incurred by the department under this section. At a minimum, the report shall include:(i) The cost to the department to issue electronic driver's licenses and electronic identification cards.(ii) The total number of electronic driver's licenses and electronic identification cards applied for.(iii) The total number of electronic driver's licenses and electronic identification cards issued.(3) The reports required under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be submitted to the following individuals:(i) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(ii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives. (iii) The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate.(iv) The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(v) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(vi) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 3. Section 1511 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 1511. Carrying and exhibiting driver's license on demand.(a) General rule.--Every licensee shall possess a physical 20250SB0861PN0961 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 driver's license issued to the licensee at all times when driving a motor vehicle and shall exhibit [the] a physical driver's license upon demand by a police officer, and when requested by the police officer the licensee shall write the licensee's name in the presence of the officer in order to provide identity.(b) Production to avoid penalty.--No person shall be convicted of violating this section or section 1501(a) (relating to drivers required to be licensed) if the person:(1) produces at the headquarters of the police officer who demanded to see the person's license, within 15 days of the demand, a driver's license valid in this Commonwealth at the time of the demand; or(2) if a citation has been filed, produces at the office of the issuing authority, within 15 days of the filing of the citation, a driver's license valid in this Commonwealth on the date of the citation.(c) Surrender of electronic product device not required.--A statute or regulation that requires an individual to surrender a driver's license or identification card to law enforcement shall not apply to an electronic product device. If an individual chooses to surrender an electronic product device to a law enforcement officer who inadvertently causes damage to the electronic device, the law enforcement officer shall not be liable for the damage to the electronic product device.(d) Privacy of information on electronic product device.--(1) If a licensee exhibits an electronic driver's license upon demand by a police officer under this section, the police officer may review only the full profile of the product holder's electronic driver's license via the 20250SB0861PN0961 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electronic product device.(2) If the police officer inadvertently reviews information on the electronic product device in addition to the licensee's full profile, the inadvertently reviewed information may not be used as evidence in a civil or criminal trial.(e) Immunity.--If a licensee or identification card holder chooses to exhibit an electronic product or an electronic product device under this title, the individual viewing the electronic product in good faith for a purpose under this title shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that arises from the licensee's choice, including, but not limited to:(1) the inadvertent viewing of materials on the electronic product device other than the electronic product;(2) the inadvertent deletion of information from the electronic product device;(3) the inadvertent interception of a communication while in possession of the electronic product device; or(4) any breakage that may occur to the electronic product device.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0861PN0961 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021